Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1082
Salon, defined.

For purposes of sections 38-1083 to 38-1090, salon means cosmetology salon and esthetics salon.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 81;

Laws 2002, LB 241, § 32;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3,120;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 344.